src-fst-phonology.xfscript.md
Definitions

Rules

Drawn from Frantz, D. G. (1991). Blackfoot Grammar, 2nd Edition. University of Toronto Press. Appendix B.

1. Gemination C1 > C2 / _ + C2

* *nitáni2t>k>wa*
* *nitánikka* ``

* *nitáni2t>awa*
* *nitánistawa* ``

* *ann>yi2hka*
* *annisska*

* *nit<siksipawa*
* *nitssiksipawa*

* *á<sínaakiwa*
* *áísínaakiwa*

* *káta7<simiwa*
* *kátai'simiwa*

* *áakoto<apinniiwa*
* *áakotaapinniiwa*

* *w<iihsíssi*
* *ohsíssi*

* *w<ínni*
* *ónni*

* *áak<i2piima*
* *áaksipiima*

* *á<i2o7kaa>wa*
* *áyo'kaawa*

* *áyo7kaa>o7pa*
* *áyo'kao'pa*

* *áyo7kaa>yi>aawa*
* *áyo'kaayaawa*

* *áókska7si>o7pa*
* *áókska'so'pa*

* *nit<i2oyi*
* *nitsoyi*

* *nit<it<itsiniki*
* *nitsitsitsiniki*

* *nit<i2oyi*
* *nitsoyi*

* *otokska7si>hsi*
* *otokska'ssi*

* *otá7po7taki>hsi* ``
* *otá'po'takssi*

* *pii<hsini*
* *pissini*

* *yaatóót*
* *aatóót*

* *waaníít*
* *aaníít*

* *w<óko7si*
* *óko'si*

* *kikáta7<waaniihpa*
* *kikáta'waaniihpa*

* *kitanistawawaaw>yináyi*
* *kitanistawawaayináyi*

* *áíhpiyi>yináyi*
* *áíhpiiyináyi*

* *nitáókska7si>hpinnan*
* *nitáókska'sspinnan*

* *á7<omai7takiwa* ``
* *áó'mai'takiwa*

* *káta7<sspitaawa*
* *kátai'sspitaawa*

* *káta7<ookaawaatsi*
* *kátaookaawaatsi*

* *káta7<ottakiwaatsi*
* *kátaoottakiwaatsi*

* *á7<isttohkohpiy7ssi*
* *áísttohkohpiy'ssi*

* *á7<o7tooyiniki*
* *áó'tooyiniki*

* *káta7<ohto7toowa*
* *kátao'ohto'toowa*

* *nit<ssksinoawa*
* *nitssksinoawa*

* *á<okska7siwa*
* *áókska'siwa*

* *atsikí>istsi*
* *atsikíístsi*

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/phonology.xfscript](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-bla/blob/main/src/fst/phonology.xfscript)</small>

---
